Hawaii statutes.
§440E-5 Jurisdiction of director. (a)
The director is vested with the sole jurisdiction, direction, management, and
control over all mixed martial arts contests to be conducted, held, or given
within the State. No mixed martial arts contest shall be conducted, held, or
given within the State except in accordance with this chapter and the rules
adopted by the director pursuant thereto.

(b) No mixed martial arts event shall take
place unless the director has granted a permit for the proposed event. In
addition, the director shall not allow any mixed martial arts contest unless:

(1) The contest consists of not more than five rounds
of a duration of not more than five minutes each with an interval of at least
one minute between each round and the succeeding round;

(2) Each contestant is not disqualified from
competing in a similar mixed martial arts contest in another jurisdiction at
the time of the contest and does not use stimulants or banned substances before
or during the contest;

(3) Each mixed martial arts contestant is examined
within six hours of the contest by at least one physician or osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 453 who shall certify in writing to the
referee of the contest that the contestant is physically fit to engage therein;

(4) Each contestant furnishes to the director:

(A) A medical report of a medical examination
completed not less than six months before the contest, including the results of
HIV and hepatitis testing; and

(B) Previous fight records that establish the
contestant's fitness to compete in the contest;

(5) The contest is under the control of a licensed
referee in the ring who has at least one year of experience in refereeing a
match or exhibition involving mixed martial arts and who has passed a physical
examination by a physician or osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 453,
including an eye examination, within two years prior to the contest;

(6) The promoter has complied with sections 440E-6
and 440E-7; and

(7) All licensees have complied with the requirements
of this chapter and rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91, including any
rules or requirements that protect the safety of the contestants to the extent
feasible. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 11, §58; am L 2010, c 117, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next